Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202669-1321
Abandoned property; State Treasurer; decline to accept; when; other payments or delivery authorized.

(a) The State Treasurer or his or her designee, after receiving reports of property deemed abandoned pursuant to the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, may decline to receive any property reported which he or she deems to have a value less than the cost of giving notice and holding sale, or he or she may, if he or she deems it desirable because of the small sum involved, postpone taking possession until a sufficient sum accumulates. Unless the holder of the property is notified to the contrary within one hundred twenty days after filing the report required under section 69-1310, the State Treasurer or his or her designee shall be deemed to have elected to receive the custody of the property.

(b) A holder may pay or deliver property before the property is presumed abandoned with written consent of the State Treasurer or his or her designee and upon conditions and terms prescribed by the State Treasurer or his or her designee. Property paid or delivered under this subsection shall be held by the State Treasurer and is not presumed abandoned until such time as it otherwise would be presumed abandoned under the act.

Laws 1969, c. 611, § 21, p. 2489;

Laws 1992, Third Spec. Sess., LB 26, § 18;

Laws 2019, LB406, § 5.